District of Columbia statutes.
1-607.05

Employee selection procedures — Relation to job required.

The selection procedures utilized shall be job related to minimize or eliminate discrimination.

History

Mar. 3, 1979, D.C. Law 2-139, § 705, 25 DCR 5740

Section References

This section is referenced in § 1-607.06.

Prior Codifications

1981 Ed., § 1-607.5.
1973 Ed., § 1-337.5.